New York, session 2025-2026, A10632.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. This act shall be known and may be cited as the "Redevelop- 2 ing Empty and Vacant Infrastructure for Vibrant Economies Act" or the 3 "REVIVE Act". 4 § 2. The Legislature finds and declares: For decades, shopping plazas, 5 retail centers, and office parks played a vital role in New York's 6 economic and social fabric. Today, however, many of these properties are 7 in decline due to changing economic conditions, evolving consumer pref- 8 erences, and the rise of alternative retail and business models. Many 9 such centers and their parking lots have become underutilized or 10 outright0 vacant, such that academics and planners have deemed them to 11 be "stranded assets." 12 At the same time, New York is confronting a severe housing crisis that 13 demands an aggressive, coordinated response. Addressing this crisis 14 requires innovative approaches that unlock the potential of stranded 15 assets for housing and community development, while thoughtfully balanc- 16 ing statewide housing goals with the needs and preferences of locali- 17 ties. A 2024 report by New York State Comptroller Thomas DiNapoli 18 concludes that, "The State must take action to stimulate community-ap- 19 propriate development actions and enhance the supply and diversity of 20 the housing stock." An efficient way for the State to increase the hous- 21 ing supply is to open up and streamline the processes for turning vacant 22 retail and parking lots into new homes. 23 Converting obsolete retail centers and parking lots into vibrant 24 mixed-use communities would promote the general welfare by revitalizing 25 underused properties, creating new opportunities for housing, busi- 26 nesses, and recreation, and strengthening the economic and social vital- 27 ity of New York's municipalities. One significant impediment to these EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD14933-04-6 A. 10632 2 1 conversions is the continued application of outdated and rigid municipal 2 zoning regulations that unnecessarily separate residential and commer- 3 cial uses. To promote the development of dynamic, mixed-use communities 4 that serve both local and statewide interests, it is appropriate for the 5 Legislature to establish standards that remove barriers to the redevel- 6 opment of stranded assets, while balancing the desires of munici- 7 palities, to unlock numerous housing opportunities for everyday New 8 Yorkers. 9 § 3. The real property law is amended by adding a new article 17 to 10 read as follows: 11 ARTICLE 17 12 REVIVE OR REDEVELOPING EMPTY AND VACANT INFRASTRUCTURE FOR VIBRANT 13 ECONOMIES ACT 14 Section 530. Definitions. 15 531. Eligible projects. 16 532. Density, height, parking, and other requirements. 17 § 530. Definitions. For the purposes of this article, the following 18 terms shall have the following meanings: 19 1. "Adaptive reuse" means the repurposing of existing buildings, 20 structures, or lots in whole or in part for residential purposes. 21 2. "Serviced lot" refers to a legal parcel of land connected to both 22 municipal water and sewer systems or has access to equivalent water and 23 sewer infrastructure to ensure adequate service availability. 24 3. "Ministerial review" means a non-discretionary approval process 25 based on objective planning standards, without public hearings or 26 subjective local review. 27 4. "Commercial zone" refers to areas designated under the local zoning 28 code primarily for commercial, office, retail, or parking uses. The term 29 "commercial zone" shall not include zones primarily designated for 30 industrial purposes, except where residential uses are expressly permit- 31 ted under the applicable municipal zoning regulations. 32 5. "Parking uses" refers exclusively to sites zoned solely for parking 33 purposes, with no allowance for other types of development or uses. 34 6. "Eligible project" means a residential or mixed-use development 35 that meets the criteria outlined in section five hundred thirty-one of 36 this article. 37 7. "Vacancy rate" means the percentage of unoccupied or unused square 38 footage in a building, structure, facility compared to the total square 39 footage of the building, structure or facility. 40 8. "Eligible project site" means any parcel of land or group of one or 41 more contiguous parcels of land upon which an eligible project is being 42 developed. 43 § 531. Eligible projects. Notwithstanding any provision of law, local 44 law, ordinance, resolution or regulation to the contrary, residential 45 and mixed-use developments shall be deemed eligible projects for the 46 purposes of this article and permitted by right on legal parcels that 47 meet all of the following criteria: 48 1. are a minimum of fifteen thousand square feet. 49 2. are located in commercial zones or are parcels designated for 50 commercial, office, retail, or parking uses. 51 3. have a vacancy rate of at least fifty percent for a continuous 52 period of at least one year immediately preceding the application for 53 development. 54 4. are serviced lots. 55 5. are not included in any active payment in lieu of taxes agreement, 56 if located entirely outside of a city with a population of one million A. 10632 3 1 or more, unless such agreement including the legal parcels to be devel- 2 oped is modified to explicitly not include such parcels. 3 § 532. Density, height, parking, and other requirements. 1. (a) For 4 any eligible project site that lies within an urban area as defined by 5 the United States census bureau, municipalities shall not limit the 6 density of such site to less than twenty dwelling units per acre. 7 (b) For any eligible project site that lies outside an urban area as 8 defined by the United States census bureau, municipalities shall not 9 limit the density of such site to less than fifteen dwelling units per 10 acre. 11 (c) For any eligible project site, the maximum density of a proposed 12 development shall be either: (i) the greatest density allowed on or 13 after January first, two thousand twenty-six for a residential or mixed- 14 use development located within the municipality's jurisdiction within 15 one mile of the proposed development; or (ii) the minimum density 16 required under this subdivision, whichever is greater. 17 2. (a) Any eligible project site located within a city with one 18 million or more inhabitants shall be allowed up to a height of ten feet 19 above the maximum height otherwise applicable to such site on or after 20 January first, two thousand twenty-six; provided, however, that if such 21 site is located within eight hundred feet of a zoning district that 22 permits a height or density for residential use greater than what is 23 otherwise provided for in this paragraph, then the city shall allow the 24 eligible project site up to the maximum height permitted in such zoning 25 district. 26 (b) Any eligible project site located within a village, town, or city 27 with fewer than one million inhabitants shall be allowed up to a height 28 equivalent to the maximum height otherwise applicable to such site 29 anywhere within the municipality on or after January first, two thousand 30 twenty-six. 31 3. No municipality or county shall adopt or enforce an ordinance, 32 order, zoning restriction, or other regulation that provides or requires 33 more than one parking space per dwelling unit for eligible projects. 34 4. For an eligible project site that lies within an urban area as 35 defined by the United States census bureau: 36 (a) (i) The municipality shall review and approve eligible project 37 applications: 38 (A) within sixty days for such projects with fewer than one hundred 39 fifty units. 40 (B) within ninety days for such projects with one hundred fifty or 41 more units. 42 (ii) If the municipality fails to meet the deadlines established under 43 this paragraph, the eligible project shall be automatically deemed 44 approved. 45 (b) The municipality shall provide public access to a standardized 46 process for ministerial review, including but not limited to clearly 47 defined timelines and submission requirements. 48 (c) If a municipality rejects an application relating to an eligible 49 project, such municipality shall provide a letter identifying the 50 specific eligibility standards and/or zoning requirements that the 51 proposal is not compliant with. 52 (d) A municipality may conduct non-binding design review hearings for 53 eligible projects; provided that such hearings shall not extend the 54 review timelines specified in this subdivision. 55 § 4. Severability. If any clause, sentence, paragraph, subdivision, 56 section or part of this act shall be adjudged by any court of competent A. 10632 4 1 jurisdiction to be invalid, such judgment shall not affect, impair, or 2 invalidate the remainder thereof, but shall be confined in its operation 3 to the clause, sentence, paragraph, subdivision, section or part thereof 4 directly involved in the controversy in which such judgment shall have 5 been rendered. It is hereby declared to be the intent of the legislature 6 that this act would have been enacted even if such invalid provisions 7 had not been included herein. 8 § 5. This act shall take effect immediately.